Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB607.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 158.200 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The boards of education of independent and county school districts may provide an
opportunity for pupils to attend moral instruction [of pupils ]in their jurisdiction, in
the manner provided in this section[KRS 158.210 to 158.260].
(2) (a) Boards of education shall allow pupils to be excused for no more than one
(1) hour on no more than one (1) day each week, which shall include time
attributed to travel to and from, to attend a district-approved request for a
moral instruction offering upon receiving the consent of the pupil's parent
or guardian.
(b) Moral instruction provided under this section shall not take place on school
property.
(c) Pupil participation in moral instruction shall be voluntary and free from
coercion by school personnel.
(d) Moral instruction shall be given without expense to any board of education
above de minimis administrative expenses incurred in carrying out this
section.
(3) An individual, organization, entity, or any combination thereof seeking to provide
a moral instruction offering for pupils may submit a written, signed request to the
board of education of a school district regarding the proposed moral instruction
offering. The request shall include:
(a) Contact information for the primary individual who will be providing the
moral instruction, as well as all other individuals who may be transporting
pupils or providing moral instruction to students through the offering;
(b) A statement acknowledging and agreeing to be bound by the requirements
placed upon moral instruction offerings under this section;
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 2/18/2025 10:03 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1287
(c) The address or a description of the location where the moral instruction will
be provided;
(d) A transportation plan to ensure the safety of pupils while traveling to and
from moral instruction within the allotted time period;
(e) A statement acknowledging, and agreeing to inform the parent or guardian
of a participating pupil, that the school district and its employees and agents
shall not incur any liability as a result of any injury sustained by the pupil
related to participation in the moral instruction offering;
(f) A statement acknowledging and agreeing to indemnify and hold harmless
the school district and its employees and agents against any claims relating
to the moral instruction offering or transportation to or from the offering;
and
(g) Proof of insurance coverage to be carried by the provider that shall include
adequate insurance for liability, property loss, and personal injury of
students related to the moral instruction offering or transportation to or
from the offering.
(4) (a) Upon receipt of a request under subsection (3) of this section, the board of
education may make arrangements with the person seeking to provide the
moral instruction offering as the board deems necessary.
(b) Upon approval by the board of education of a request under this section, the
superintendent of the school district shall require each individual identified
in the request to submit to a national and state criminal history background
check by the Department of Kentucky State Policy and the Federal Bureau
of Investigation and have a clean CA/N check, provided by the individual,
consistent with the provisions of KRS 160.380(6). The individuals, or the
organization or entity through which the moral instruction offering will be
provided, shall be responsible for all costs associated with obtaining the
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 2/18/2025 10:03 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1287
criminal history and CA/N checks under this paragraph.
(c) As a condition of the agreement between the board and a provider, the
board shall require that any individual identified in the request under
subsection (3) of this section be barred from providing transportation or
participating in moral instruction offerings under this section upon receipt
by the school district of a report documenting a record of:
1. Child abuse or neglect;
2. A sex crime or criminal offense against a victim who is a minor as
defined in KRS 17.500; or
3. A violent crime as defined in KRS 17.165;
by the individual. The prohibition shall continue until the board receives an
updated record for that individual that does not contain a disqualifying
item.
(5) A pupil who attends a moral instruction offering at the time specified and for the
period fixed shall be:
(a) Credited with the time of attendance as if he or she had been in actual
attendance in school, and the time shall be included as part of the actual
school work required in KRS 158.060. A pupil shall not be penalized for any
school work missed during the specified time; and
(b) Included in calculating the average daily attendance for the Support
Education Excellence in Kentucky program as if the pupil was in actual
attendance in school.
(6) A pupil who does not participate in a moral instruction offering shall remain in
school during the time when the instruction is being given, and shall take
noncredit enrichment courses or participate in educational activities not required
in the regular curriculum, and that time shall be included as part of the actual
school work required in KRS 158.060. Students of different grade levels may be
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 2/18/2025 10:03 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1287
placed into combined classrooms in accordance with maximum class size
allotments as described in KRS 157.360. These courses or activities shall be
supervised by certified school personnel and may include but are not limited to
study hall, computer instruction, music, art, library, physical education, and
tutorial assistance.
(7) A school district shall not discriminate against a pupil for his or her participation
or nonparticipation in a moral instruction offering.
Section 2. The following KRS sections are repealed:
158.210 Survey of desire for moral instruction may be made.
158.220 Time allowed for moral instruction in suitable place.
158.230 Arrangements with persons in charge.
158.240 Credit for moral instruction.
158.250 Activities for nonparticipants in moral instruction classes.
158.260 Cost of moral instruction.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 2/18/2025 10:03 AM Jacketed